District of Columbia statutes.
3-2004

Repealed

Procedure for refusal, revocation, or suspension of license or certificate; reissuance.

Repealed.

June 7, 1938, 52 Stat. 613, ch. 321, § 4
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245,§ 38(b), 40 DCR 660
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1236, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-904.
1973 Ed., § 2-1304.

Repeal of Law 9-245

See note to § 3-2001.